Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5210YC (1) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 452A.16 Exempt fuel ââ agricultural 1 implements. 2 The excise tax under section 452A.3 shall not be imposed or 3 collected on ethanol blended gasoline formulated with more than 4 eighty-five percent by volume of ethanol when purchased at a 5 terminal or refinery rack exclusively for use in an implement 6 used in agricultural production. 7